Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1508
Board membership; qualifications.

The board shall consist of five professional members and one public member appointed pursuant to section 38-158. Members shall meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165. The professional members shall consist of three licensed hearing instrument specialists, at least one of whom does not hold a license as an audiologist, one otolaryngologist, and one audiologist. At the expiration of the four-year terms of the members serving on December 1, 2008, successors shall be appointed for five-year terms.

Laws 1969, c. 767, § 15, p. 2914;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 130;

Laws 1986, LB 701, § 12;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 160;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 81;

Laws 1993, LB 375, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 52;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 173;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-4715;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 572;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 26;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 16.